District of Columbia statutes.
16-580

Quashing attachment where judgment obtained to hinder just claims.

Where an attachment levied under this subchapter is based upon a judgment obtained by default or consent without a trial upon the merits, the court, upon motion of an interested person, may quash the attachment upon satisfactory proof that the judgment was obtained without just cause and solely for the purpose of preventing or delaying the satisfaction of just claims.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 557, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-580.
1973 Ed., § 16-580.